Utah statutes.
76-6-514.   Bribery or threat to influence contest.

A person is guilty of a felony of the third degree if:

(1)  With a purpose to influence any participant or prospective participant not to give his best efforts in a publicly exhibited contest, he confers or offers or agrees to confer any benefit upon or threatens any injury to a participant or prospective participant; or

(2)  With a purpose to influence an official in a publicly exhibited contest to perform his duties improperly, he confers or offers or agrees to confer any benefit upon or threatens any injury to such official; or

(3)  With a purpose to influence the outcome of a publicly exhibited contest, he tampers with any person, animal, or thing contrary to the rules and usages purporting to govern the contest; or

(4)  He knowingly solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept any benefit, the giving of which would be criminal under Subsection (1) or (2).

